Massachusetts, session 194th, S2605.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law or by-law to the contrary, the
regular town election in the town of Canton of town officials and the determination of other
matters that are required by law to be determined by ballot shall be held on the first Tuesday
following the first Monday of November in each year.
SECTION 2. In even numbered years, state and federal elections and town of Canton
elections of town officials and the determination of other matters that are required by law to be
determined by ballot shall be combined on a single ballot.
SECTION 3. The town of Canton shall synchronize all local elections of town officials
and the determination of others matters that are required by law to be determine by ballot
occurring in even years with state and federal elections.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage, provided that:
of 2

(a) if passage of this act takes place during a presidential election year the effective date
of this act shall be delayed by one year until the following November; and
(b) the term of an elected official of the town of Canton that is set to expire in the year in
which this act takes effect shall be extended until the certification of the regular town election
held in November of such year pursuant to this act, unless such member vacates office sooner, in
which case said vacancy shall be filled in accordance with the applicable law for filling such a
vacancy in effect at the time said vacancy occurs.
of 2